Illinois, session 104th, HB4505.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 6A-1 and 6A-2 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/6A-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 6A-1)7    Sec. 6A-1. (a) Any county in which there is no city, 8village, or incorporated town with a board of election 9commissioners may establish a county board of election 10commissioners either (1) by ordinance of the county board or 11(2) by vote of the electors of the county in accordance with 12subsection (a) of Section 6A-2.13    The fact that some territory in a county is within the 14corporate limits of a city, village or incorporated town with 15a board of election commissioners does not prevent that county 16from establishing a county board of election commissioners in 17accordance with this Article if no portion of such city, 18village or incorporated town was within the county at the time 19of the establishment of the board of election commissioners 20for such city, village or incorporated town. If such a county 21establishes a county board of election commissioners pursuant 22to this Article, the county board of election commissioners 23shall, with respect to the territory in the county within the   HB4505- 2 -LRB104 18523 SPS 31965 b1corporate limits of the city, village or incorporated town, 2supersede the board of election commissioners of that city, 3village or incorporated town.4    (b) Any county with a population of more than 700,000 5persons as of the 2010 federal decennial census that borders 6another state and borders no more than 2 other Illinois 7counties, shall be subject to a county board of election 8commissioners beginning 90 days after the effective date of 9this amendatory Act of the 98th General Assembly.10    (c) Any county with a population of less than 200,000 but 11more than 175,000 persons as of the 2010 federal decennial 12census in which a city, village, or incorporated town with a 13board of election commissioners is located may establish a 14county board of election commissioners by vote of the electors 15of the county in accordance with subsection (b) of Section 166A-2. If such a county establishes a county board of election 17commissioners, the county board of election commissioners, 18with respect to the territory in the county within the 19corporate limits of the city, village, or incorporated town, 20shall supersede the board of election commissioners of that 21city, village, or incorporated town. 22(Source: P.A. 98-115, eff. 7-29-13.) 23    (10 ILCS 5/6A-2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 6A-2)24    Sec. 6A-2. Submission to voters. 25    (a) Whenever registered voters in a county described in   HB4505- 3 -LRB104 18523 SPS 31965 b1subsection (a) of Section 6A-1, numbering at least 1,000 or 21/8 of the number voting at the last preceding general 3election in the county, whichever is less, petition the 4circuit court to submit to the electors of the county a 5proposition to establish a county board of election 6commissioners, the circuit court shall cause such proposition 7to be submitted to the electors of the county at the next 8succeeding general election. A vote of approval from 60% of 9the electors is required for the proposition to be approved.10    (b) If the county board of a county described in 11subsection (c) of Section 6A-1 passes an ordinance or 12resolution establishing a county board of election 13commissioners, then the proposition to establish a county 14board of election commissioners shall be submitted to the 15electors of that county at the next possible general election. 16The board shall certify the ordinance or resolution and the 17proposition to the proper election officials who shall submit 18the proposition at the next general election in accordance 19with the general election law. 20    (c) The proposition shall be submitted in the same manner 21as provided in Article 6 for the adoption of Articles 6, 14 and 2218 by cities, villages and incorporated towns, except that the 23question shall be stated: "Shall a board of election 24commissioners be established for .... County?"25(Source: P.A. 98-115, eff. 7-29-13.)